West Virginia, session 2025, SB830.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4.  CORRECTIONS MANAGEMENT. §15A-4-21. Director of employment; director of housing; released inmates; duties. The commissioner may employ or contract for a Director of Employment and a Director of Housing for released inmates. The Director of Employment shall work with federal, state, county, and local government and private entities to negotiate agreements which facilitate employment opportunities for released inmates. The Director of Housing shall work with federal, state, county, and local government and private entities to negotiate agreements which facilitate housing opportunities for released inmates. The Director of Employment shall investigate job opportunities and give every possible assistance in helping released inmates find employment. The Director of Housing shall work in conjunction with the Bureau of Community Corrections and the Parole Board to reduce release delays due to lack of a home plan, and develop community housing resources, and provide short-term loans to released inmates for costs related to reentry into the community.